Hawaii statutes.
§88-192 Examination by physician. In
connection with the consideration of any application for disability pension or
review of the pension granted under this part, any county pension board may
refer any applicant or person receiving the pension to any physician receiving
a regular monthly salary or fee from the State or any of its political
subdivisions for physical examination and report to the board thereon as to the
existence or continuance of disability. Any physician to whom the application
is referred shall make the necessary physical examination and report the
physician's findings and recommendations to the board, but shall neither charge
nor receive any fee for the particular examination and report. [L 1937, c 237,
§6; am L 1939, c 112, §1(e); RL 1945, §6189; RL 1955, §6-171; HRS §88-192; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next